District of Columbia statutes.
31-3107

Preservation of certain benefits.

Nothing in this chapter shall serve to diminish the benefits of any insured person or prevent the offering or acceptance of benefits that exceed the minimum benefits required by this chapter.

Feb. 28, 1987, D.C. Law 6-195, § 8, 34 DCR 491

History

1981 Ed., § 35-2307.

Prior Codifications